California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------

33381.

The California American Indian education centers established pursuant to this article shall serve as community-based educational resource centers to American Indian pupils, parents, guardians, and the public schools in order to promote the academic and cultural achievement of the pupils. The centers, based upon established priority needs, may accomplish the following:

(a) Improve the academic achievement of American Indian pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(b) Improve the self-concept and sense of identity of American Indian pupils and adults.

(c) Serve as a center for related community activities.

(d) Provide individual and group counseling to pupils and adults related to personal adjustment, academic progress, and vocational planning.

(e) Create and offer coordinated programs with the public schools.

(f) Provide a focus for summer cultural, recreational, and academic experiences.

(g) Create and offer adult classes and activities that benefit parents or guardians of pupils in its programs.

(h) Provide training programs to develop pathways to college and the workplace for American Indian pupils.

(i) Provide American Indian educational resource materials to pupils, their parents, and the schools they attend in order to ensure appropriate tribal histories and cultures are made available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 880, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

33382.

The state board, upon the advice and recommendations of the Superintendent, shall approve revised guidelines for the selection and administration of California American Indian education centers. The Superintendent shall request input from the American Indian Education Oversight Committee on amendments and updates to the 1975 guidelines and the committee may provide input to the Superintendent prior to the submission of the guidelines to the state board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

33383.

(a) An application for the establishment of a California American Indian education center may be made to the department by any tribal group or incorporated American Indian association, separately or jointly, upon forms provided by the department. Funding for existing centers or a new center shall not exceed funding provided for these purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute. The department shall evaluate and rank the proposals for funding purposes.

(b) An application for funding by a California American Indian education center shall be ranked and approved on the basis of all of the following criteria:

(1) The application is designed to achieve measurable objectives for the center.

(2) The degree of commitment of the applicant to the purpose of American Indian education as demonstrated by the policies adopted, the allocation of staff, fiscal, and material resources, and the integration of existing resources and services.

(3) The extent and degree of collaborative efforts among local community resources, organizations, schools, and tribal communities.

(4) The potential impact a center will have on pupils, their families, and other organizations in the region.

(5) The number of pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, within the community of the applicant.

(6) Existing centers shall have priority based upon the demonstrated impact of each program on pupils, their parents or legal guardians, and the community served.

(7) Existing centers created by the department shall receive priority in funding.

(8) The application of an existing center shall receive priority for funding over an application for a new center.

(c) The funding level for each center shall be based upon a comprehensive community needs assessment, including the applicant’s history of educational support for American Indian pupils, their parents or legal guardians, and the amount of collaboration with local American Indians.

(d) Funding for each center shall be distributed by reference to pupil population, pupil academic performance, and the local economic base.

(e) To the extent possible, the centers shall be distributed in regions throughout the state in order to reflect the American Indian population base.

(f) The approval of an application for the establishment of a California American Indian education center shall be effective for a period of five calendar years. One calendar year before the expiration of the five-year period, the department shall commence an evaluation of the center in order to determine whether to renew the application of the existing center or approve a new application to establish a California American Indian education center.

(g) (1) If the application for a center has been approved by the department and the applicant has received written verification of that approval, the department shall distribute 75 percent of the grant award for each year of the grant no later than 45 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act or an additional authorizing statute, whichever is later.

(2) The department shall distribute the remaining 25 percent of the grant award for each year of the grant no later than April 1 of the year following the year in which the initial 75 percent is distributed pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 170, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

33384.

(a) (1) Each center shall annually submit a report to the department that includes appropriate data, presented in a format developed jointly with the department, that reflects each center’s progress toward meeting its stated objectives, including pupil academic performance, meeting the continued educational and cultural needs of the community that the center serves, and any other objectives chosen by the center.

(2) On or before January 1, 2021, and every five years thereafter, the department shall report all of the following information to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature:

(A) Consolidated results for all centers, consistent with federal law regarding the privacy of pupil information.

(B) Information required to evaluate the consolidated results.

(C) Recommendations for program improvement.

(b) The centers shall maintain sound fiscal policies. The department shall provide technical assistance and training to the centers in order to assist the centers to maintain sound fiscal policies. The department may require an annual program audit. However, if the department deems it fiscally unsound for the
 centers to provide an annual audit, a fiscal review shall suffice.

(c) The department shall provide technical assistance and professional development to the directors of the California American Indian education centers throughout the year that shall include timely documented responses and professional guidance meant to improve center programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 490, Sec. 1.   (SB 911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. California Indian Education Act [33390. - 33391.]

33390.

This article shall be known, and may be cited as, the California Indian Education Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.   (AB 1703)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

33391.

(a) The Legislature encourages local educational agencies to form California Indian Education Task Forces with California Indian tribe’s local to their region or tribes historically located in the region. Participants in these meetings are encouraged to discuss issues of mutual concern and to work to do all of the following: 

(1) Develop a thorough, shared understanding of accurate, high-quality curricular materials about the history, culture, and government of local tribes, and develop curricular materials for use within local educational agencies that include tribal experiences and perspectives and teach about the history, culture, and government of local tribes. 

(2) Develop a
 shared understanding of proper or improper instructional material when these materials use depictions of Native Americans.

(3) Encourage local educational agencies to adopt curriculum developed by the California Indian Education Task Forces, in order to ensure that all pupils learn about the history, culture, government, and experiences of their Indian peers and neighbors, and to ensure that Indian pupils are more engaged and learn more successfully.

(4) Identify the extent and nature of the achievement gap between Indian pupils and other pupils, and identify the strategies necessary to close it.

(b) California Indian Education Task Forces shall submit, within one year of formation and annually thereafter, a report of findings to the department, including a finding on the progress of the work described in paragraphs
 (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a). 

(c) The department shall submit, within one year of receiving task force reports pursuant to subdivision (b) and annually thereafter, a report to the Senate Education Committee and the Assembly Committee on Education regarding the progress made in the narrowing of the achievement gap, and the identification and adoption of curriculum regarding tribal history, culture, and government. The report shall include information about any obstacles encountered, and any strategies under development to overcome those obstacles.

(d) California Indian Education Task Forces may submit curricular materials developed pursuant to subdivision (a) to the county office of education, or consortium of county offices of education, that has contracted to develop a model curriculum related to Native American studies pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 51226.9. The county office of education, or consortium of county offices of education, shall consider these submitted materials for inclusion in the model curriculum.

(e) For purposes of this article, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 477, Sec. 1.   (AB 1703)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Educational Evaluations [33400. - 33407.]

33400.

It is the intention of the Legislature in enacting this article that:

(a) Evaluations shall be performed in such a manner as to minimize the resources required of school districts in the collection, analysis, and reporting of evaluation information. In order to achieve this goal, program evaluations shall require only that information which is essential to the State Department of Education for carrying out statutorily mandated functions, and shall be conducted only as necessary for the conduct of those functions. In addition, in evaluations of state-funded programs, the department may use sampling procedures as it determines to be appropriate based on professional standards.

(b) Evaluations shall be performed and reported in such a manner as to maximize their utility to decisionmakers in the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 927, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

33403.

The State Department of Education shall perform evaluations of those educational programs as determined to be necessary by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to carry out the purposes of this article or as required by the Legislature. Program evaluations determined to be necessary by the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall be carried out in accordance with Section 33400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 927, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

33404.

It is the understanding of the Legislature that the evaluation needs of the educational programs change over a period of time and during the progress of the programs and, therefore, the Legislature may require through supplemental language to the Budget Act:

(a) That additional types of information or reporting formats be employed.

(b) That the evaluation be altered to reflect current needs.

(c) That an evaluation shall be conducted by contracted, independent evaluators.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 927, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

33406.

The State Department of Education shall conduct special studies as determined to be necessary by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to carry out the purposes of this article or as required by the Legislature.

The department shall utilize existing information to the maximum extent feasible in conducting the special studies. The special studies shall address topics determined by the Legislature or the Superintendent of Public Instruction to be of current policy significance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 927, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

33407.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall annually, not later than February 15, submit to the State Board of Education and the Legislature a proposal for the initiation or continuance for the succeeding fiscal year of special studies and evaluation activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 927, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Audits of Contracting Agencies [33420. - 33421.]

33420.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in cooperation with the Department of Finance and the State Auditor, shall, on or before July 1, 1980, provide for a plan for independent audits of state and federal funds allocated to private agencies that are under contract with the State Department of Education for the provision of educational services.

For the purpose of this article, “educational services” includes, but is not limited to, child nutrition and child development services.

To the maximum extent possible, the plan shall conform to audit procedures pursuant to Section 41020.5.

(b) Effective July 1, 1980, the State Department of Education, as a condition to any contract with a private agency for the provision of educational services, shall require a periodic audit of state and federal funds to be conducted by departmental staff auditors or a certified public accountant or public accountant who is licensed by the California Board of Accountancy. For child development services, the audit shall include all funds deposited in the child development fund. For all other educational services, the audit shall be limited to those state and federal funds accruing to the private agency as a result of its contract with the State Department of Education.

(c) If in the course of those audits of a private agency, an audit exception is reported by the certified public accounting firm in excess of a material amount as determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, upon final determination by the superintendent of the amount of the audit exception, collect that audit exception and redistribute the amount collected to the same class of program, or withhold the amount of the audit exception from the next payment to the agency in which the audit exception was discovered.

(d) The State Department of Education shall establish a schedule for audits that meets federal regulations.

(e) The State Department of Education may exempt from the provisions of this section those agencies for which, in the department’s estimation, the cost of an audit would be inordinate in relation to the level of funding received by the private agency for the educational services provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1055, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

33421.

Every private agency which receives state funds which may be audited pursuant to Section 33420 shall, at the request of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, make all records pertaining to its state-funded programs available to the Department of Education during regular business hours. The records shall be retained by each private agency for at least five years except for Child Nutrition Program records. Child Nutrition Program records shall be retained in accordance with regulations adopted by the United States Department of Agriculture relating to the retention of those records. However, in cases where an audit has been requested by a state agency or the United States Department of Agriculture which remains unresolved, the records shall be retained until the date the audit is resolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. California Youth Leadership Project [33425. - 33428.]

33425.

(a) The California Youth Leadership Project is hereby established under the department for the purpose of promoting youth civic engagement through meaningful opportunities to improve the quality of life for California’s disconnected and disadvantaged youth.

(b) The California Youth Leadership Project shall support and promote youth civic engagement by awarding scholarships to youth between 14 and 18 years of age. Furthermore, youths awarded scholarships by the California Youth Leadership Project shall be given the opportunity to make meaningful recommendations regarding legislation and policies that impact their own lives and the lives of the thousands of other youth in California whose voices often go
 unheard. An organization that operates civic engagement programs may submit applications for participation in the project on behalf of interested youth.

(c) The California Youth Leadership Project shall allocate scholarship award funds to organizations that submit applications on behalf of youth who are selected to receive scholarship awards under this article. These organizations shall do, without limitation, all of the following for the youth who receive scholarship awards under this article:

(1) Provide youth participants tools to examine and discuss policy and fiscal issues affecting the interests, needs, and conditions of the youth of California.

(2) Provide youth participants the opportunity to formally advise and make recommendations to the Legislature and the Governor on specific issues affecting youth. These
 issues may include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Education.

(B) Employment.

(C) Access to state and local governmental services.

(D) The environment.

(E) Behavioral and physical health.

(F) Safety.

(G) Technology.

(H) Criminal justice.

(I) Homelessness.

(J) Foster care.

(K) Child
 welfare.

(L) Emancipation.

(M) Financial literacy.

(N) Substance abuse.

(O) Driver’s license requirements.

(P) Poverty.

(Q) Increased youth participation in state and local government.

(R) Issues affecting youth with disabilities.

(S) Any other policy or fiscal issues deemed appropriate by the department.

(3) Provide youth participants the opportunity to consult with any existing local level youth advisory commissions and
 community-based, grassroots youth-led organizations for input and potential solutions on issues related to youth.

(4) Provide youth participants the opportunity to convene and conduct meetings to fulfill the purposes of this chapter.

(5) Provide youth participants the opportunity to act as an information center on California youth policy and fiscal issues, including, but not limited to, the issues listed in paragraph (2).

(6) When available, enable individual youth to travel to the State Capitol to learn the legislative process and, on occasion, to testify at legislative hearings.

(d) An organization that receives a scholarship award on behalf of youth under this article shall use these funds only for youth-related activities described in subdivision
 (c).

(e) For purposes of this article, disconnected and disadvantaged youth described in subdivision (a) include, but are not limited to, youth who are homeless between 18 and 24 years of age, youth with disabilities, youth who are from minority racial or ethnic groups, youth who are in or have been emancipated from foster care, youth who have been in or are on parole from the juvenile justice system, youth who are from low-income households, youth who are high school dropouts or are at risk of dropping out of school, youth who are pregnant or are young mothers, and other youth who could benefit from participation in the California Youth Leadership Project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 379, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

33426.

(a) The California Youth Leadership Project shall be overseen by the California Youth Leadership Project Committee.

(b) The California Youth Leadership Project Committee shall be established and oversee the California Youth Leadership Project and distribute funds pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 18736) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code and this article.

(c) Members of the California Youth Leadership Project Committee, in making youth scholarship awards, shall take into consideration that awarded youth represent the racial, ethnic, socioeconomic, cultural, physical, and
 educational diversity of California. Priority for awarding scholarships under this article shall be given to at-promise or disadvantaged youth between 14 and 18 years of age, as their participation in the California Youth Leadership Project will provide keen insight into many of the issues that youth face in their day-to-day lives.

(d) (1) The California Youth Leadership Project Committee shall be chaired by the Superintendent, or their designee, and shall include no more than six members.

(2) The Superintendent shall appoint the following four members to the California Youth Leadership Project Committee:

(A) A representative from a statewide nonprofit youth
 organization.

(B) A representative from a community-based nonprofit organization that serves youth or deals with youth-related issues, including, but not limited to, the issues described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 33425.

(C) A representative of a local educational agency or school district.

(D) A youth between 14 and 18 years of age who has participated in a youth leadership program involving lobbying the Legislature on issue areas affecting youth. This person shall serve only in an advisory capacity.

(3) The California Health and Human Services Agency may also, but is not required to, appoint a member to the California Youth
 Leadership Project Committee.

(4) To the extent possible, a member of the California Youth Leadership Project Committee, appointed under any of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (2) shall have experience and be trained to work with youth between 14 and 18 years of age on any of the issues described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 33425, and shall have special experience in civic engagement, advocacy, and at least one of the following issue areas affecting youth:

(A) Crisis prevention or intervention.

(B) Drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse prevention or intervention.

(C) Foster care.

(D) Juvenile justice.

(E) Homelessness.

(F) Lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender rights and social justice.

(G) Mental health.

(H) Youth with disabilities.

(e) The members of the California Youth Leadership Project Committee shall serve on a voluntary basis and shall not receive a salary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 7.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

33427.

Duties of the California Youth Leadership Project Committee shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Develop and provide applications for the California Youth Leadership Project scholarship and collect applications from youth who would like to apply.

(b) Determine ways to promote the program and make applications available.

(c) Establish criteria for the selection of youth, and make awards based on those criteria and the purposes of this chapter.

(d) Ensure that there is no discrimination based on race,
 religious creed, color, national origin, age, gender, marital status, disability, sex, or sexual orientation.

(e) Establish the time, location, and number of annual meetings of the committee. The committee shall meet no less than once each year.

(f) If necessary, enter into a mutually agreed upon interagency agreement with the department to carry out administrative duties related to the project.

(g) Submit an annual budget and report to the department.

(h) (1) Determine when there are sufficient funds to support the project. If the committee determines that there are insufficient funds to cover all costs, the activities of the California Youth Leadership Project shall cease.

(2) State funds shall not be used to support the California Youth Leadership Project except as provided in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 18736) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 379, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

33428.

(a) The funds for the California Youth Leadership Project shall be allocated from the California Youth Leadership Fund pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 18736) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, or from private funds directed to the department and allocated to the California Youth Leadership Project Committee for the purpose of funding activities of the California Youth Leadership Project.

(b) The California Youth Leadership Project may accept gifts and grants from any source, public or private, to help perform its functions, pursuant to this article.

(c) The California Youth
 Leadership Project Committee shall have the authority to define its program and utilize its funds in any way necessary to carry out the duties of this article, including, but not limited to, partnering with nonprofit groups or state agencies to perform various duties required by this article, as long as the program or activity is not in violation of a state law or regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 379, Sec. 2.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. The Learning Communities for School Success Program [33430. - 33436.]

33430.

The Learning Communities for School Success Program is hereby established for the purpose of implementing, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7599.2 of the Government Code, the K–12 education portion of the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act, as approved as Proposition 47 by the voters at the November 4, 2014, statewide general election. Through this program, the department shall administer grants and coordinate assistance to local educational agencies to support the local educational agencies in identifying and implementing evidence-based, nonpunitive programs and practices that are aligned with the goals for pupils contained in each of the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as
 applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.   See identical section in the Article 10 added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

33431.

(a) A local educational agency that chooses to apply for funding pursuant to this article shall submit an application to the department to receive a grant, in a format and by a date determined by the department. An application submitted to the department by a local educational agency shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Information about the pupil and school needs within the local educational agency.

(2) The activities the local educational agency will undertake with the grant funding.

(3) How the activities specified in paragraph (2) support the local
 educational agency’s goals for pupils contained in its local control and accountability plan.

(4) How the local educational agency will measure outcomes associated with the activities specified in subdivision (e) and metrics reported in the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan.

(b) An application shall be for three years of grant funding. Consistent with the provisions of this article, the department may establish requirements for grantees to meet at the end of the first and second years of funding in order to receive funding for the remaining grant period.

(c) The department shall determine eligibility for grants and the distribution of grant funding based on all of the following factors:

(1) Pupil and school needs the local
 educational agency will address with the grant funds.

(2) Number of pupils to be served with the grant funds.

(3) Number, size, and type of participating schools within the local educational agency.

(4) Any challenges the local educational agency experiences in building capacity for fulfilling the purposes of this article.

(5) The unique characteristics of small school districts, given their challenges with economies of scale and access to services in rural locations.

(d) (1) Before the initial application deadline, the department shall conduct targeted outreach to local educational agencies that are likely to be given priority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 33432 and shall offer the local educational agencies technical assistance as they develop their grant applications.

(2) The department may provide technical assistance with application development to any local educational agency that requests assistance. This may include assistance from external entities the department may contract with as part of the training and technical assistance structure established pursuant to Section 33433.

(e) The department shall issue application guidelines that include, at a minimum, information about the department’s plans for overall evaluation of the program considering the objectives identified in Section 33434. For purposes of facilitating program evaluation, the department, in consultation with the executive director of the state board, shall identify a set of measures and associated data sources that are deemed valid and reliable for measuring
 pupil and school outcomes and assessing the benefits of the program.

(f) In meeting the requirements of this section, the department shall consult with stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of local educational agencies, teachers and other school personnel, parents, advocacy organizations with experience working with target vulnerable populations, and parent- and youth-serving community-based organizations. It the intent of the Legislature that stakeholders provide input to the department on the design of the application and review process, including the size of the grant awards. The stakeholders shall not be involved in determining who will be awarded grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.   See identical section in the Article 10 added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

33432.

(a) A local educational agency that receives a grant shall use the grant funds for planning, implementation, and evaluation of activities in support of evidence-based, nonpunitive programs and practices to keep the state’s most vulnerable pupils in school. These activities shall complement or enhance the actions and services identified to meet the local educational agency’s goals as identified in its local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as applicable. These activities may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Establishing a community school, as defined in Section 33435.

(2) Implementing activities or programs to improve attendance and reduce chronic absenteeism, including, but not limited to, early warning systems or early intervention programs.

(3) Implementing restorative practices, restorative justice models, or other programs to improve retention rates, reduce suspensions and other school removals, and reduce the referral of pupils to law enforcement agencies.

(4) Implementing activities that advance social-emotional learning, positive behavior interventions and supports, culturally responsive practices, and trauma-informed strategies.

(5) Establishing partnerships with community-based organizations or other relevant entities to support the implementation of evidence-based, nonpunitive approaches to further the goals of the program.

(6) Adding or increasing staff within a local educational agency whose primary purpose is to address ongoing chronic attendance problems, including, but not necessarily limited to, conducting outreach to families and children currently, or at risk of becoming, chronically truant.

(b) In selecting grant recipients pursuant to this article, the department shall give priority to a local educational agency that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) (A) Has a high rate of chronic absenteeism, out-of-school suspension, or school dropout for the general pupil population or for a numerically significant pupil subgroup, as identified in a local control and accountability plan pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 52052.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “high rate” means a rate that exceeds the state average.

(2) Is located in a community with a high crime rate.

(3) Has a significant representation of foster youth among its pupil enrollment.

(c) A local educational agency that receives a grant shall provide a local contribution of matching expenditures equal to at least 20 percent of the total grant award. This local contribution can be from cash expenditures or in-kind contributions. A local educational agency is encouraged to exceed the 20-percent match requirement to enable the local educational agency to sustain the activities or programs established under this article beyond the three-year grant period.

(d) A local educational agency that receives a
 grant shall use the grant funds to increase or improve services that the local educational agency currently provides for purposes specified in this article.

(e) A local educational agency shall not use grant funds to pay for law enforcement activities, including personnel or equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.   See identical section in the Article 10 added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

33433.

(a) The department shall use the funding the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act authorizes for administrative costs pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7599.2 of the Government Code, which is no more than 5 percent of the annual funding the department receives from the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Fund, for the administrative costs of implementing this article, including, but not limited to, administering grant awards, coordinating the training and technical assistance structure described in subdivision (b), and completing the evaluation pursuant to Section 33434.

(b) The department shall establish a structure to deliver training and technical assistance to grantees using regional workshops and
 technical assistance providers that have expertise on pupil engagement, school climate, truancy reduction, and supporting pupils who are at risk of dropping out of school or who are victims of crime. The department may contract with those providers to assist the grantees as well as to serve as a resource for other local educational agencies that may use their own funding sources to engage in this community of practice. Technical assistance provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the technical assistance provided to a local educational agency by the county superintendent of schools or the Superintendent, as appropriate, in the development of the local control and accountability plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.   See identical section in the Article 10 added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

33435.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Community school” means a public school that participates in a community-based effort to coordinate and integrate educational, developmental, family, health, and other comprehensive services through community-based organizations and public and private partnerships with one or more community partners for the delivery of community services that may be provided at a schoolsite to pupils, families, and community members.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.   See identical section in the Article 10 added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

33436.

This article shall not become operative unless funds are appropriated in the annual Budget Act or another statute to the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Fund in accordance with the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act for the purposes specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2017.   See identical section in the Article 10 added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533.   Note: Operational condition applies to Article 10, commencing with Section 33430.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. The Learning Communities for School Success Program [33430. - 33436.]

33430.

The Learning Communities for School Success Program is hereby established for the purpose of implementing, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 7599.2 of the Government Code, the K–12 education portion of the Safe Neighborhoods and Schools Act, as approved as Proposition 47 by the voters at the November 4, 2014, statewide general election. Through this program, the department shall administer grants and coordinate assistance to local educational agencies to support the local educational agencies in identifying and implementing evidence-based, nonpunitive programs and practices that are aligned with the goals for pupils contained in each of the local educational agency’s local control and accountability plan pursuant to Section 47606.5, 52060, or 52066, as
 applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 533, Sec. 2.   (SB 527)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section conditionally operative as provided in Section 33436.)
-------------------------------------------

33431.

(a) A local educational agency that chooses to apply for funding pursuant to this article shall submit an application to the department to receive a grant, in a format and by a date determined by the department. An application submitted to the department by a local educational agency shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) Information about the pupil and school needs within the local educational agency.

(2) The activities the local educational agency will undertake with the grant funding.

(3) How the activities specified in paragraph (2) support the local
 educational agency’s goals for pupils contained in its local control and accountability plan.
